Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the Department of Public Safety  Standards and
Training and approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Private Security Entity License Fee: $624
(2) Late Renewal Fee: $50
(3) Duplicate or Replacement License Fee: $24
(4) Non-sufficient Funds Penalty Fee: $25
SECTION 2.
For the purpose of  carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), a
fingerprinting and background check fee of $140, adopted by the Higher Education  Coordi-
nating Commission and approved by  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, is
approved.
SECTION 3. For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased  fees, adopted by the State Department of Agriculture and ap-
proved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Hemp Grower Late Fee: $250
(2) Noncommercial Pesticide Applicator License per year, including one category: $50
(3) Noncommercial Pesticide Applicator License per year, for each additional  category:
$7.50
(4) Noncommercial  Pesticide Applicator License per year, for each additional category
after license issued: $12.50
(5) Noncommercial Pesticide Trainee License: $50
SECTION 4.
For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), the
following new or increased fees, adopted by the Department  of Environmental Quality and
approved by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, are approved:
(1) Seismic Risk Assessment Submittal Fee: $39,000
(2) Annual Compliance Fee: $23,000
(3) Risk Mitigation Implementation Plan Submittal Fee: $36,000
(4) Mattress Stewardship Fee: $205,000
(5) Carrier Permit Annual Compliance: $200
SECTION 5.
For the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of ORS 291.055 (1)(e), an Al-
cohol Delivery Training Program Review Fee of  $250, adopted by the Oregon Liquor and
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-INTRO) Page 1
Cannabis Commission and approved by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services,
is approved.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5702 (SB 5702-INTRO) Page 2